District of Columbia statutes.
31-3234

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to health insurers beginning with referrals issued 120 days after the promulgation of final regulations under § 31-3233.

April 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-97, § 5, 49 DCR 994